Louisiana, session 2026, HB709.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 49:966(D)(1)(a) and (L) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
49:953.1, 960, and 965(C) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§953.1. System for notification of rulemakings
A. The state register shall establish a notification system that permits users
to elect to receive e-mail notification of pending rulemakings by specific title,
division, chapter, or rule number.
B. The secretary of state, in coordination with the state register, shall provide
for businesses registered with the secretary to receive e-mail notifications of pending
rulemakings related to regulations the business is or will be subject to, to the extent
practicable.
* * *
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1163 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 709
§960. Office of information and regulatory affairs
A. The Legislature of Louisiana makes the following findings:
(1) Executive branch agencies should promulgate rules only when required
by law, when necessary to interpret law, or when made necessary by compelling
public need.
(2) An efficient regulatory planning and review process is vital to ensure that
the state's regulatory system best serves the people of Louisiana.
(3) Coordinated review of agency rulemaking is necessary to ensure that
regulations are consistent with applicable law and the principles set forth in this
Section, and that the decisions made by one agency do not conflict with the policies
or actions taken or planned by another agency.
(4) The office of the governor is an appropriate agency to carry out the
review function.
B. The governor may establish in the office of the governor an office to be
known as the office of information and regulatory affairs.
C.(1) The office of information and regulatory affairs shall enhance planning
and coordination with respect to both new and existing rules, to restore the integrity
and legitimacy of regulatory review and oversight, to make the process more
accessible and open to the public, and to make more efficient the regulatory rules
promulgation process.
(2) The office of information and regulatory affairs may be charged with the
following duties:
(a) Identifying regulations that impose significant or unique burdens on
governmental entities and that appear to have outlived their justification or be
otherwise inconsistent with the public interest.
(b) Providing guidance and oversight to ensure that each agency's regulatory
actions are consistent with applicable law and the principles set forth in this Section
and do not conflict with the policies or actions of another agency.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1163 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 709
(c) Reviewing proposed rules prior to initiating promulgation for approval
pursuant to deadlines established by the office of information and regulatory affairs.
* * *
§965. Filing; taking effect of rules; expiration of rules
* * *
C. A rule adopted by an agency within a department with an appointed
secretary in accordance with R.S. 49:961 shall expire on June thirtieth of the tenth
year following the year of its adoption unless legislation is enacted to continue the
effectiveness of the rule to a certain date or indefinitely.
* * *
§966. Review of agency rules; fees
* * *
D.(1)(a) The chairman of each standing committee to which reports are
submitted shall appoint an oversight subcommittee, which may shall conduct
hearings on all rules that are proposed for adoption, amendment, or repeal and on all
proposed fee adoptions, increases, or decreases. Any The oversight committee
hearing shall be conducted after any hearing is conducted by the agency pursuant to
R.S. 49:961.
* * *
L. After submission of the report required by Subsection K of this Section
to the standing committee, a public hearing may shall be held by the committee for
the purpose of reviewing the report with representatives of the agency.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 49:966(E)(2) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 3. The provisions of this Act shall apply to rules proposed for adoption,
amendment, or repeal and in a notice of intent submitted on or after the effective date of this
Act for publication in the Louisiana Register.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1163 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 709
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.